Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.474

Penalty—Failure to comply with chapter or rule.

Every person who fails to comply with this chapter, or any rule adopted under it, may be subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by the director, in an amount of not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars for every such violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Every person, who, through an act of commission or omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered to have violated this chapter and may be subject to the penalty provided for in this section.

[ 1998 c 36 s 12; 1987 c 45 s 10.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.